Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2396.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 90ACONSUMER FUEL PRICE RELIEFSec.90A01. Scope of chapter.90A02. Consumer fuel price relief.90A03. Revenue loss estimate.90A04. Transfer required.90A05. Fuel sale price reduction.§ 90A01. Scope of chapter.This chapter provides for consumer fuel price relief.§ 90A02. Consumer fuel price relief.1234567891011121314151617 (a) Reduction.--Notwithstanding Chapters 90 (relating to liquid fuels and fuels tax) and 95 (relating to taxes for highway maintenance and construction) or other law to the contrary, the following taxes and fees shall be reduced at the rates and amounts imposed as follows:(1) Beginning with the first day of the first full month after the effective date of this paragraph and ending on the first day after the end of the sixth full month after the effective date of this paragraph, 100% of the taxes imposed under section 9004(b) and (d) (relating to imposition of tax, exemptions and deductions).(2) Beginning with the first day of the first full month after the effective date of this paragraph and ending on the first day after the end of the 12th full month after the effective date of this paragraph, 50% of the fee imposed under section 9024 (relating to electric vehicle road user charge).(b) Applicability.--The reduction under subsection (a) shall apply to:(1) liquid fuels, fuels and alternative fuels used or delivered within this Commonwealth for the period under subsection (a)(1); and(2) new vehicle registrations or vehicle registration renewals during the period beginning under subsection (a)(2).§ 90A03. Revenue loss estimate.The Department of Revenue shall, in consultation with the Department of Transportation, provide to the Office of the Budget and the General Assembly not later than three months before the end of the six-month period under section 90A02(b)(1) (relating to consumer fuel price relief) the estimated loss in 20260HB2396PN3216 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 revenue due to the reduction under section 90A02.§ 90A04. Transfer required.(a) Certification.--No later than 30 days after receipt of the estimated loss in revenue under section 90A03 (relating to revenue loss estimate), the Office of the Budget shall certify the amount and notify the State Treasurer of the certified amount.(b) Transfer.--No later than 60 days after receipt of the certified estimate under subsection (a), the State Treasurer shall transfer an amount equal to the estimate from the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund to the Motor License Fund or any other fund or account authorized by law to receive revenue from the taxes imposed under section 9004(b) and (d) (relating to imposition of tax, exemptions and deductions) or the fee imposed under section 9024 (relating to electric vehicle road user charge).(c) Applicability.--Section 1703-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, shall not apply to transfers made from the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund under this section.§ 90A05. Fuel sale price reduction.(a) Reduction required.--A dealer or alternative fuel dealer that sells fuels, liquid fuels or alternative fuels for a six-month period beginning on the effective date of this subsection to consumers under the tax reduction authorized under section 90A02(a)(1) (relating to consumer fuel price relief):(1) may not include in the sale price to the consumers the cost of the tax amount under section 9004(b) and (d) (relating to imposition of tax, exemptions and deductions); and20260HB2396PN3216 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) shall pass on the reduced costs realized by the dealer or alternative fuel dealer from the tax reduction under section 90A02(a)(1) in the sale price to the consumers.(b) Policy and guidelines.--The Department of Revenue shall develop policies and guidelines to assist dealers and alternative fuel dealers with compliance with subsection (a).(c) Authority of Attorney General and district attorneys.--A violation of subsection (a) shall constitute a violation of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law. The Office of Attorney General or the appropriate district attorney shall have all powers and duties under the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law necessary to enforce this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect June 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2396PN3216 - 4 - 123456789101112131415